South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3112.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1. (A)(1) There is created a study committee to examine: (a) the maternal mortality rate among non-Hispanic Black women in South Carolina, and how this varies from the rates experienced by other women; (b) maternal mortality data associated with perinatal care, including by race or ethnicity, to determine any statewide trends, statistically significant differences in maternal mortality rates among races or ethnicities, and reasons for the differences; and (c) all methods and practices that will improve rates of maternal mortality among non-Hispanic Black women in South Carolina. (2) For purposes of this SECTION: (a) "Healthcare provider" means a hospital, as defined in Section 44-7-130, that provides perinatal care, a birthing center, as defined in Section 44-89-30, and any primary healthcare clinic or physician's office in the State delivering perinatal care services. (b) "Perinatal care" means the provision of care during pregnancy, labor, delivery, and postpartum and neonatal periods. (B) The study committee shall provide a report that: (1) addresses the areas of examination set forth in subsection (A); and (2) makes recommendations for legislative or policy changes to decrease maternal mortality rates and disparities in maternal mortality rates associated with perinatal care. (C)(1) The study committee is composed of thirteen members, consisting of: (a) two administrators of hospitals that provide perinatal care whose patient demographics are well represented by communities of color, appointed in consultation with the South Carolina Hospital Association as follows: (i) one member appointed by the Chair of the Senate Medical Affairs Committee; and (ii) one member appointed by the Chair of the House Medical, Military, Public and Municipal Affairs Committee; (b) two obstetrician gynecologists providing perinatal care whose patient demographics are well represented by communities of color, appointed in consultation with the South Carolina Medical Association as follows: (i) one member appointed by the Senate Minority Leader; and (ii) one member appointed by the House Minority Leader; (c) a psychologist appointed by the Senate Majority Leader, in consultation with the South Carolina Board of Examiners in Psychology; (d) a mental health professional appointed by the House Majority Leader, in consultation with the South Carolina Board of Examiners for Licensure of Professional Counselors, Marriage and Family Therapists, Addiction Counselors and Psycho-Educational Specialists; (e) two advanced practice registered nurses providing perinatal care whose patient demographics are well represented by communities of color, appointed by the Governor, in consultation with the Board of Nursing; (f) one birthing center administrator and one licensed lay midwife, whose patient demographics are well represented by communities of color, appointed by the Governor, in consultation with the state Midwifery Advisory Council; (g) one individual with public health expertise, relating specifically to perinatal public health issues, appointed by the Director of the Department of Public Health; (h) one individual with public health expertise, relating specifically to perinatal public health issues and who actively participates in the South Carolina Birth Outcomes Initiative, appointed by the Director of the Department of Health and Human Services; (i) one member of the state Maternal Morbidity and Mortality Review Committee, appointed by the Director of the Department of Public Health; and (j) one member with expertise in health data and statistics appointed by the Executive Director of the South Carolina Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office. (2) A vacancy in the membership of the study committee must be filled in the manner of the original appointment. (3) Members of the study committee shall serve without per diem, mileage, or other compensation generally provided to members of boards and commissions. (D) The Senate Medical Affairs Committee and the House Medical, Military, Public and Municipal Affairs Committee shall provide appropriate staffing for the study committee. (E) The study committee shall provide a report with findings and recommendations to the General Assembly by January 1, 2026. The study committee shall dissolve upon providing its report to the General Assembly or on January 1, 2026, whichever occurs first. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----